Vermont, session 2025-2026, H847.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5862g is added to read:
§ 5862g. HUNGER FREE VERMONT CHECKOFF
(a) Returns filed by individuals shall include, on a form prescribed by the
Commissioner of Taxes, an opportunity for the taxpayer to designate funds to
Hunger Free Vermont, Inc.
(b) Amounts so designated shall be deducted from refunds due to, or
overpayments made by, the designating taxpayers. All amounts so designated
and deducted shall be deposited in an account by the Commissioner of Taxes
for payment to Hunger Free Vermont, Inc. If at any time after the payment of
VT LEG #386390 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.847
2026 Page 2 of 3
amounts so designated to the account it is determined that the taxpayer was not
entitled to all or any part of the amount so designated, the Commissioner may
assess, and the account shall then pay to the Commissioner, the amount
received, together with interest at the rate prescribed by section 3108 of this
title, from the date the payment was made until the date of repayment.
(c) The Commissioner of Taxes shall explain to taxpayers the purposes of
the account and how to contribute to it. The Commissioner shall make
available to taxpayers the annual income and expense report of Hunger Free
Vermont, Inc., and shall provide notice in the instructions for the State
individual income tax return that the report is available at the Department of
Taxes.
(d) If amounts paid with respect to a return are insufficient to cover both
the amount owed on the return under this chapter and the amount designated
by the taxpayer as a contribution to Hunger Free Vermont, Inc., the payment
shall first be applied to the amount owed on the return under this chapter and
the balance, if any, shall be deposited in the account.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the Commissioner
to collect any amount designated as a contribution to Hunger Free Vermont,
Inc.
VT LEG #386390 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.847
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect retroactively on
January 1, 2025, and apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1,
2025.
VT LEG #386390 v.1